test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_I_mitigwaab_gt-norm.yaml
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabenhiminaanibaning
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabenhiminaanibanan
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabenhiminaanibanag
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabenhiminiibaning
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabenhiminiibanan
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabenhiminiibanag
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabenhimini***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabenhimini***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabenhimini***idig, idog***ag
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabenhimiwaaibaning
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabenhimiwaaibanan
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabenhimiwaaibanag
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabenhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabensiminaanibaning
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabensiminaanibanan
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabensiminaanibanag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabensiminiibaning
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabensiminiibanan
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabensiminiibanag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabensimini***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabensimini***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabensimini***idig, idog***ag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabensimiwaaibaning
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabensimiwaaibanan
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabensimiwaaibanag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabenhishinaanibaning
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabenhishinaanibanan
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabenhishinaanibanag
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabenhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabenhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabenhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabenhishiniibaning
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabenhishiniibanan
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabenhishiniibanag
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabenhishini***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabenhishini***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabenhishini***idig, idog***ag
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabenhishiwaaibaning
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabenhishiwaaibanan
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabenhishiwaaibanag
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabenhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabensishinaanibaning
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabensishinaanibanan
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabensishinaanibanag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabensishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabensishinaan***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabensishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabensishiniibaning
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabensishiniibanan
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabensishiniibanag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabensishini***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabensishini***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabensishini***idig, idog***ag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabensishiwaaibaning
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabensishiwaaibanan
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabensishiwaaibanag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabensishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabensishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabensishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabimishinaanibaning
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabimishinaanibanan
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabimishinaanibanag
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabimishiniibaning
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabimishiniibanan
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabimishiniibanag
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabimishini***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabimishini***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabimishini***idig, idog***ag
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabimishiwaaibaning
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabimishiwaaibanan
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabimishiwaaibanag
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nimitigwaabenhimishinaaniban
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nimitigwaabenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nimitigwaabenhimishiniiban
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nimitigwaabenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nimitigwaabenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nimitigwaabenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nimitigwaabensimishinaaniban
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nimitigwaabensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nimitigwaabensimishiniiban
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nimitigwaabensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nimitigwaabensimishiwaaiban
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nimitigwaabensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: gimitigwaabenhimishinaaniban
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: gimitigwaabenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: gimitigwaabenhimishiniiban
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: gimitigwaabenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: gimitigwaabenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: gimitigwaabenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: gimitigwaabensimishinaaniban
     +Px2mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: gimitigwaabensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: gimitigwaabensimishiniiban
     +Px2mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: gimitigwaabensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: gimitigwaabensimishiwaaiban
     +Px2mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: gimitigwaabensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: omitigwaabenhimishinaaniban
     +Px3mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: omitigwaabenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: omitigwaabenhimishiniiban
     +Px3mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: omitigwaabenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px3mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: omitigwaabenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px3mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: omitigwaabenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: omitigwaabensimishinaaniban
     +Px3mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: omitigwaabensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: omitigwaabensimishiniiban
     +Px3mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: omitigwaabensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px3mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: omitigwaabensimishiwaaiban
     +Px3mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: omitigwaabensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: imitigwaabenhimishinaaniban
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: imitigwaabenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: imitigwaabenhimishiniiban
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: imitigwaabenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: imitigwaabenhimishiwaaiban
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: imitigwaabenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: imitigwaabensimishinaaniban
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: imitigwaabensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: imitigwaabensimishiniiban
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: imitigwaabensimishini***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: imitigwaabensimishiwaaiban
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: imitigwaabensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: nimitigwaabenhimishinaaning
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: nimitigwaabenhimishinaanan
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: nimitigwaabenhimishinaanag
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: nimitigwaabenhimishiniing
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: nimitigwaabenhimishinian
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: nimitigwaabenhimishiniag
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: nimitigwaabenhimishiwaaing
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: nimitigwaabenhimishiwaaan
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: nimitigwaabenhimishiwaaag
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: nimitigwaabensimishinaaning
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: nimitigwaabensimishinaanan
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: nimitigwaabensimishinaanag
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: nimitigwaabensimishiniing
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: nimitigwaabensimishinian
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: nimitigwaabensimishiniag
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: nimitigwaabensimishiwaaing
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: nimitigwaabensimishiwaaan
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: nimitigwaabensimishiwaaag
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: gimitigwaabenhimishinaaning
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: gimitigwaabenhimishinaanan
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: gimitigwaabenhimishinaanag
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: gimitigwaabenhimishiniing
